Utah statutes.
64-13-13.   Administrators.

The executive director shall appoint deputy directors, wardens, regional administrators, and other administrators as necessary to administer correctional programs.   Deputy directors, wardens, and regional administrators shall have experience in corrections, related criminal justice fields, law, or criminology, and experience in administration.

